Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.230

Liability of commission, state, etc.

Obligations incurred by any commission and any other liabilities or claims against the commission shall be enforced only against the assets of such commission in the same manner as if it were a corporation and no liability for the debts or actions of the commission shall exist against either the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof or against any other commission established pursuant to this chapter or the assets thereof or against any member officer, employee, or agent of the board in his or her individual capacity. The members of any such commission, including employees of such board, shall not be held responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of any such commission. The liability of the members of such commission shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6095; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.230. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 23.]